Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB787.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 205.533 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [By January 1, 2019, ]A managed care organization shall establish an interactive
website[Web site], operated by the managed care organization, that allows
providers to file grievances, appeals, and supporting documentation electronically
in an encrypted format that complies with federal law and that allows a provider to
review the current status of a matter relating to an appeal or a grievance filed
concerning a submitted claim.
(2) Each managed care organization's website, established in accordance with
subsection (1) of this section shall include, in a highly visible and easily
accessible manner, the following:
(a) The names of the managed care organization's:
1. Provider relations representatives for behavioral health;
2. Provider relations representatives for physical health; and
3. Provider contract representatives for provider contract changes;
(b) The email address and telephone number for each individual described in
paragraph (a) of this subsection; and
(c) A detailed explanation, written in plain and simple to understand language,
of the managed care organization's process for:
1. Internal appeals; and
2. Providers to request an external, independent third-party review.
(3) Information required to be accessible on a managed care organization's website
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall be kept current and updated within
thirty (30) days of any change to the information.
Section 2. KRS 205.534 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A Medicaid managed care organization with whom the Department for Medicaid
Page 1 of 10
XXXX 2/19/2025 11:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1947
Services contracts for the delivery of Medicaid services shall:
(a) Provide:
1. A toll-free telephone line for providers to contact the insurer for claims
resolution for forty (40) hours a week during normal business hours in
this state;
2. A toll-free telephone line for providers to submit requests for
authorizations of covered services during normal business hours and
extended hours in this state on Monday and Friday through 6 p.m.,
including federal holidays;
3. With regard to any adverse payment or coverage determination, copies
of all documents, records, and other information relevant to a
determination, including medical necessity criteria and any processes,
strategies, or evidentiary standards relied upon, if requested by the
provider. Documents, records, and other information required to be
provided under this paragraph shall be provided at no cost to the
provider; and
4. For any adverse payment or coverage determination, a written reply in
sufficient detail to inform the provider of all reasons for the
determination. The written reply shall include information about the
provider's right to request and receive at no cost to the provider
documents, records, and other information under subparagraph 3. of this
paragraph;
(b) Afford each participating provider the opportunity for an in-person meeting
with a representative of the managed care organization on:
1. Any clean claim that remains unpaid in violation of KRS 304.17A-700
to 304.17A-730; and
2. Any claim that remains unpaid for forty-five (45) days or more after the
Page 2 of 10
XXXX 2/19/2025 11:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1947
date the claim is received by the managed care organization and that
individually or in the aggregate exceeds two thousand five hundred
dollars ($2,500);
(c) Reprocess claims that are incorrectly paid or denied in error, in compliance
with KRS 304.17A-708. The reprocessing shall not require a provider to rebill
or resubmit claims to obtain correct payment. No claim shall be denied for
timely filing if the initial claim was timely submitted;[ and]
(d) Establish processes for internal appeals, including provisions for:
1. Allowing a provider to file any grievance or appeal related to the
reduction or denial of the claim within one hundred twenty (120)[sixty
(60)] days of receipt of a notification from the managed care
organization that payment for a submitted claim has been reduced or
denied;[ and]
2. a. Ensuring the timely consideration and disposition of any grievance
or any appeal within thirty (30) days from the date the grievance or
appeal is filed with the managed care organization by a provider
under this paragraph.
b. Failure of the managed care organization to comply with
subdivision a. of this subparagraph shall result in:
i. A fine or penalty as provided for in subsection (6) of this
section; or
ii. If related to an unresolved appeal, granting the provider's
appeal to reimburse and reversal of the managed care
organization's reduction or denial of the claim;
3. Ensuring that, following the resolution of an appeal that results in a
determination that a monetary amount is owed to a provider, payment
is made in full to the provider within thirty (30) days from the date on
Page 3 of 10
XXXX 2/19/2025 11:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1947
which the appeal was resolved. Payments required under this
subparagraph shall include:
a. The monetary amount determined to be owed to the provider plus
twelve percent (12%) interest; and
b. If applicable, reasonable attorney's fees incurred by the provider
to appeal the managed care organization's denial; and
(e) With regard to provider audits:
1. a. Ensure, except as provided in subdivision b. of this
subparagraph, that audit requests are reasonable in regard to the
number of providers being audited, the number of records being
audited, and the timeframe audit records cover by utilizing a
valid sampling methodology to determine which providers may
be audited, the number of records that may be audited, and the
timeframe covered by records that may be audited.
b. The requirement that audit decisions be based on a valid
sampling methodology shall not apply to cases in which an
allegation of fraud, willful misrepresentation, or abuse is made
by the managed care organization.
c. A managed care organization shall notify the Department for
Medicaid Services of any allegations of fraud, willful
misrepresentation, or abuse prior to initiating a provider audit;
2. Provide written notification to a provider that he or she is being
audited. The written notification shall include:
a. The date the written notification was sent to the provider;
b. An explanation of the purpose of the audit;
c. The number of records being audited;
d. The timeframe covered by the records being audited;
Page 4 of 10
XXXX 2/19/2025 11:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1947
e. The number of calendar days the provider shall be allowed, in
accordance with subparagraph 3. of this paragraph, to provide
or grant access to the requested records;
f. The managed care organization's or, if the managed care
organization has contracted with a third-party to conduct the
audit, the third-party entity's point of contact for the audit,
including the individual's name, telephone number, mailing
address, email address, and fax number; and
g. Complete written instructions for filing an appeal including the
appeal shall be submitted by the provider to the managed care
organization or, if the managed care organization has contracted
with a third-party to conduct the audit, the third-party entity;
3. Allow at least thirty (30) calendar days for a provider to provide or
grant access to the requested records, except that a provider shall be
allowed:
a. A minimum of sixty (60) calendar days if more than thirty (30)
records are being requested or if the timeframe the records cover
is more one (1) year; and
b. Additional time beyond the minimally required thirty (30) or
sixty (60) calendar days if the provider provides justification for
the need for additional time;
4. Limit the timeframe of records requested as part of an audit to not
more than two (2) years from the date on which a claim was submitted
for payment, except that a longer timeframe shall be permitted if
allowed under federal law or if there is evidence of fraud. If evidence
of fraud exists, the managed care organization shall notify the
Department for Medicaid Services of the evidence of fraud prior to
Page 5 of 10
XXXX 2/19/2025 11:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1947
initiating a provider audit;
5. Complete an audit within one hundred twenty (120) calendar days
from the date on which the written audit notification required under
subparagraph 2. of this paragraph was sent to the provider;
6. Provide written findings of a completed audit to the provider within
thirty (30) calendar days of date on which the audit was completed.
Written audit findings shall:
a. Include the name, phone number, mailing address, email
address, and fax number of the manage care organization's or, if
the managed care organization has contracted with a third-party
to conduct the audit, the third-party entity's point of contact
responsible for the audit findings;
b. Provide claims-level detail of the amounts and reasons for each
claim recovery found to be due; and
c. Clearly state if no amounts have been found to be due;
7. a. Exempt, as provided in subparagraph 8. of this paragraph, a
provider from recoupment of funds if an audit results in the
identification of any clerical or recordkeeping errors, including
typographical errors, scrivener's errors, omissions, or computer
errors, unless the auditing entity provides proof of intent to
commit fraud or the error results in an actual overpayment to the
provider.
b. If an auditing entity discovers or is otherwise in possession of
proof of intent to commit fraud, the auditing entity shall
immediately notify the Department for Medicaid Services;
8. Allow the provider to submit amended claims within thirty (30)
calendar days of the discovery of a clerical or recordkeeping error in
Page 6 of 10
XXXX 2/19/2025 11:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1947
lieu of recoupment if the services were otherwise provided in
accordance with state and federal law;
9. Not receive payment based on the amount recovered in the audit;
10. Only recoup funds from a provider upon the final disposition of the
audit including the appeals process as established in KRS 205.646;
and
11. Base recoupment of claims on the actual overpayment or
underpayment of claims unless the provider agrees to a settlement to
the contrary.
(2) (a) For the purposes of this subsection:
1. "Timely" means that an authorization or preauthorization request shall
be approved:
a. For an expedited authorization request, within seventy-two (72)
hours after receipt of the request. The timeframe for an expedited
authorization request may be extended by up to fourteen (14) days
if:
i. The enrollee requests an extension; or
ii. The Medicaid managed care organization justifies to the
department a need for additional information and how the
extension is in the enrollee's interest; and
b. For a standard authorization request, within two (2) business days.
The timeframe for a standard authorization request may be
extended by up to fourteen (14) additional days if:
i. The provider or enrollee requests an extension; or
ii. The Medicaid managed care organization justifies to the
department a need for additional information and how the
extension is in the enrollee's interest; and
Page 7 of 10
XXXX 2/19/2025 11:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1947
2. a. "Expedited authorization request" means a request for
authorization or preauthorization where the provider determines
that following the standard a timeframe could seriously jeopardize
an enrollee's life or health, or ability to attain, maintain, or regain
maximum function; and
b. A request for authorization or preauthorization for treatment of an
enrollee with a diagnosis of substance use disorder shall be
considered an expedited authorization request by the provider and
the managed care organization.
(b) A decision by a managed care organization on an authorization or
preauthorization request for physical, behavioral, or other medically necessary
services shall be made in a timely and consistent manner so that Medicaid
members with comparable medical needs receive a comparable, consistent
level, amount, and duration of services as supported by the member's medical
condition, records, and previous affirmative coverage decisions.
(3) (a) Each managed care organization shall report on a monthly basis to the
department:
1. The number and dollar value of claims received that were denied,
suspended, or approved for payment;
2. The number of requests for authorization of services and the number of
such requests that were approved and denied;
3. The number of internal appeals and grievances filed by members and by
providers and the type of service related to the grievance or appeal, the
total dollar amount of all denials being appealed, the time of
resolution, the number of internal appeals and grievances where the
initial denial was overturned and the type of service and dollar amount
associated with the overturned denials;[ and]
Page 8 of 10
XXXX 2/19/2025 11:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1947
4. For each internal appeal or grievance not resolved within sixty (60)
calendar days, the name of the provider who filed the unresolved
internal appeal or grievance, the dollar amount of the claim that was
denied if a denial is being appealed, the reason for the delay in
resolving the internal appeal or grievance, the current status of the
internal appeal or grievance, and the outcome determination if
rendered prior to the filing of the report; and
5. Any other information required by the department.
(b) The data required in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be separately
reported by provider category, as prescribed by the department, and shall at a
minimum include inpatient acute care hospital services, inpatient psychiatric
hospital services, outpatient hospital services, residential behavioral health
services, and outpatient behavioral health services.
(4) On a monthly basis, the department shall transmit to the Department of Insurance a
report of each corrective action plan, fine, or sanction assessed against a Medicaid
managed care organization for violation of a Medicaid managed care organization's
contract relating to prompt payment of claims. The Department of Insurance shall
then make a determination of whether the contract violation was also a violation of
KRS 304.17A-700 to 304.17A-730.
(5) By December 15 of each year beginning in 2025, the Department for Medicaid
Services shall submit to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the
Interim Joint Committee on Health Services and the Legislative Oversight and
Investigations Committee a report containing the following information reported
separately for each managed care organization with whom the department has
contracted for the delivery of Medicaid services:
(a) The number and dollar value of all claims that were received by the
managed care organization and the number of dollar value of those claims
Page 9 of 10
XXXX 2/19/2025 11:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1947
that were approved for payment, denied, or suspended;
(b) The number of requests for authorization of services received and the
number of those requests that were approved or denied;
(c) The number of internal appeals and grievances filed by Medicaid members
and by providers, the types of services to which the internal appeals and
grievances relate, the total dollar amount of denials that were appealed, the
average length of time to resolution, the number of internal appeals and
grievances where the initial denial was overturned, and the types of services
and dollar amount of overturned denials; and
(d) The number of internal appeals and grievances not resolved within sixty
(60) calendar days, the ten (10) most common reasons given for delays, the
total dollar amount when a denial is being appealed, and the number of
final determinations made in favor of a provider.
(6) Any Medicaid managed care organization that fails to comply with subsection
(1)(d)2. of this section, KRS 205.522, 205.532 to 205.536, and 304.17A-515 may
be subject to fines, penalties, and sanctions, up to and including termination, as
established under its Medicaid managed care contract with the department.
(7) The Department for Medicaid Services may promulgate administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement and enforce this
section.
Page 10 of 10
XXXX 2/19/2025 11:49 AM Jacketed